District of Columbia statutes.
45-605

“Executor” to include “administrator”.

Wherever the word “executor” is used it shall include “administrator,” and vice versa, unless such application of the term would be unreasonable.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1189, ch. 854

Cross References

Acts and resolutions of Council, rules of construction, see § 1-301.45 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 49-205.
1973 Ed., § 49-205.